Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
PART 3
NOMINATIONS

1-13.5-301. Eligibility for office - prohibitions - exceptions - challenges.

No person except an eligible elector who is at least eighteen years of age, unless another age is required by law, is eligible to hold any office in this state. No person is eligible to be a candidate for office unless that person fully meets the qualifications of that office as stated in the constitution and statutes of this state on or before the date the person is nominated to the office. The designated election official shall not certify the name of any candidate who fails to swear or affirm under oath that he or she fully meets the qualifications as of the date of nomination or who is unable to provide proof that he or she meets any requirements of the office relating to registration, residence, or property ownership.

The information found on the person's voter registration record is admissible as prima facie evidence of compliance with the registration and residence requirements of this section. The information found in the property owners list is admissible as prima facie evidence of compliance with property ownership requirements.

Except as otherwise provided in this subsection (2), no person is eligible to be a candidate for more than one office in the same local government at one time. This subsection (2) does not:

Apply to memberships on different special district or business improvement district boards; or

Prohibit a candidate or elected official of any political subdivision from being a candidate or member of the board of directors of any special district, business improvement district, or districts in which he or she is an eligible elector, unless otherwise prohibited by law.

The qualification of any candidate may be challenged by an eligible elector of the local government within five days after the date that the designated election official certifies the candidate to the ballot. The challenge shall be made by verified petition setting forth the facts alleged concerning the qualification of the candidate and shall be filed in the district court in the county in which the local government is located. The hearing on the qualification of the candidate must be held not less than five nor more than ten days after the date the designated election official's statement is issued that certifies the candidate to the ballot. The court shall hear the testimony and other evidence and, within forty-eight hours after the close of the hearing, determine whether the candidate meets the qualifications for the office for which the candidate has declared. Part 1 of article 17 of title 13, C.R.S., regarding frivolous, groundless, or vexatious actions, applies to this section.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 11, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-302. Nomination of local government candidates.

Except as provided in section 1-13.5-303 or other applicable law, candidates for office of nonpartisan local governments must be nominated, without regard to affiliation, by petition on forms supplied by the designated election official. A petition of nomination may consist of one or more sheets, but it must contain the name and address of only one candidate and indicate the office to which the candidate is seeking election. The candidate's name must be printed on each sheet of a petition of nomination.

Nomination petitions for a candidate in a local government, other than a special district or business improvement district, may be circulated and signed, beginning on January 1 of the year in which election for that office is conducted and ending on the sixty-seventh day prior to the day of election, by at least two eligible electors residing within or eligible to vote in the local government.

The circulator of each nomination petition shall make an affidavit that each signature thereon is the signature of the person whose name it purports to be and that each signer has stated to the circulator that the signer is an eligible elector of the local government for which the nomination is made.

A petition is not valid if it does not contain the requisite number of signatures of eligible electors. The designated election official shall inspect timely filed petitions of nomination to ensure compliance with this section.

Each nomination petition must be filed with the designated election official no later than the sixty-seventh day prior to the day of election. Every petition must have endorsed on it or appended to it the written affidavit of the candidate accepting the nomination and swearing that the candidate satisfies the requirements set forth in law to be a candidate and hold office in the local government.

The designated election official shall preserve all nomination petitions filed with him or her for a period of two years. All such petitions are open to public inspection under proper regulation by the designated election official with whom they are filed.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 12, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-303. Candidates for special district or business improvement district director - self-nomination and acceptance form.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, no earlier than January 1 and no later than the normal close of business on the sixty-seventh day before the date of a regular special district election, any person who desires to be a candidate for the office of a special district director shall file a self-nomination and acceptance form or letter signed by the candidate and by an eligible elector of the state as a witness to the signature of the candidate.

On the date of signing the self-nomination and acceptance form or letter, a candidate for director shall be an eligible elector of the special district. If the district is divided into director districts established pursuant to section 32-1-301 (2)(f), C.R.S., the candidate shall be an eligible elector within the boundaries of the director district in which the candidate is running for office.

The self-nomination and acceptance form or letter must contain the name of the special district in which the election will be held, the county or counties where the special district is located, the special district director office sought by the candidate, the term of office sought if more than one length of a director's term is to be voted upon at the election, the date of the election, the full name of the candidate as it is to appear on the ballot, and whether the candidate is a member of an executive board of a unit owners' association, as defined in section 38-33.3-103, located within the boundaries of the special district for which the candidate is running for office. The candidate and witness must provide their respective residence addresses, including the street number and name, city or town, and county, and telephone numbers, and the candidate must provide a current e-mail address. Unless physically unable, all candidates and witnesses shall sign their own signature and shall print their names and include the date of signature on the self-nomination and acceptance form or letter.

The self-nomination and acceptance form or letter must be filed with the designated election official or, if none has been designated, the presiding officer or the secretary of the board of directors of the special district in which the election will be held.

The self-nomination and acceptance form or letter must be verified and processed substantially as provided in this subsection (5)(a) and subsection (5)(b) of this section, a protest on such a form or letter must be determined substantially as provided in sections 1-4-909 and 1-4-911, and an insufficient form or letter may be cured by submitting an amended self-nomination and acceptance form or letter to the designated election official before the normal close of business on the sixty-seventh day before an election.

Upon filing, the designated election official shall review the information in the self-nomination and acceptance form or letter and verify the information against the registration records, and, where applicable, the county assessor's records.

If, while verifying a signer's information against the registration records in accordance with subsections (5)(a) and (5)(b) of this section, the designated election official finds that the signer provided his or her mailing address rather than his or her residence address as required under subsection (3) of this section, the designated election official may accept the self-nomination form if the designated election official is able to locate the signer's record in the statewide voter registration database and determine that the self-nomination form is otherwise sufficient.

After review, the designated election official shall provide notification of the sufficiency or insufficiency of the candidate.

In a business improvement district with an elected board of directors, nominations for business improvement district directors must be handled substantially as provided in subsections (1) to (5) of this section.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 13, § 6, effective February 18.

L. 2016:

(5) amended, (HB 16-1442), ch. 313, p. 1266, § 3, effective August 10.

L. 2021:

(3) and (5) amended, (SB 21-160), ch. 133, p. 536, § 3, effective September 7.

1-13.5-304. Withdrawal from nomination.

Any person who has been nominated and who has accepted a nomination, or filed a self-nomination form or letter, may cause his or her name to be withdrawn from such nomination at any time before the election by executing a written affidavit withdrawing from the nomination. The withdrawing candidate shall sign the affidavit and file it with the designated election official.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 14, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-305. Write-in candidate affidavit.

A write-in vote for any local government office is counted only if an affidavit of intent to be a write-in candidate is filed with the designated election official by the person whose name is written in not later than sixty-four days before the day of the election. The affidavit of intent must indicate that the signer desires the office and is qualified to assume the duties of that office if elected.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 14, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-306. Objections to nominations.

All self-nomination and acceptance forms or letters, petitions of nomination, and affidavits of intent to be a write-in candidate that are in apparent conformity, as determined by the designated election official, with section 1-13.5-302, 1-13.5-303, or 1-13.5-305, are valid unless objection thereto is duly made in writing within three days after the filing of the same. In case an objection is made, the designated election official shall mail forthwith notice of the objection to any candidate for the same office. The designated election official shall decide objections within forty-eight hours after the same are filed, and any objections upheld may be remedied or defect cured upon the original petition, by an amendment thereto, or by filing a new self-nomination and acceptance form or letter, petition of nomination, or affidavit of intent, as applicable, within three days after the objection is upheld, but in no event later than the fifty-eighth day before the day of election. The designated election official shall pass upon the validity of all objections, whether of form or substance, and the designated election official's decisions upon matters of form are final. The designated election official's decisions upon matters of substance are open to review if prompt application is made, as provided in section 1-13.5-1501, but the remedy in all cases shall be summary, and the decision of the district court is final and not subject to review by any other court; except that the supreme court, in the exercise of its discretion, may review any proceeding in a summary way.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 14, § 6, effective February 18.